Washington statutes.
RCW 42.14.020

Office of governor.

(1) In the event that all successors to the office of governor as provided by Article 3, section 10, as amended by amendment 6 of the Constitution of the state of Washington are unavailable following a catastrophic incident, the powers and duties of the office of governor shall be exercised and discharged by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(2) In the event the speaker of the house is unavailable, the powers and duties of the office of governor shall be exercised and discharged by the president pro tem of the senate.

(3) In the event that neither the speaker nor the president pro tem is available, the house of representatives and the senate in joint assembly shall elect an emergency interim governor.

[ 2019 c 471 s 5; 1963 c 203 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2019 c 471 ss 4-10: See note following RCW 42.14.010.

Finding—Intent—2019 c 471: See note following RCW 38.52.010.